Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-7803
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Primary Care Investment Act:

(1) Department means the Department of Insurance; and

(2) Primary care physician means a physician licensed under the Uniform Credentialing Act and practicing in the area of family medicine, pediatrics, internal medicine, geriatrics, obstetrics and gynecology, or general medicine.

Laws 2022, LB863, § 13.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.